Tennessee, session 114, HB1916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-13-104(b)(3)(B)(i), is amended by
deleting "Upon application for a firm license" and substituting "Except as provided in subdivision
(b)(3)(B)(iv), upon application for a firm license".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-13-104(b)(3)(B), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(iv) An affiliate broker or broker licensed under this chapter is not required to
obtain the additional licensure or complete the classroom hours in training programs
described in subdivisions (b)(3)(B)(i) and (ii); provided, that any vacation lodging
services must be under the supervision of the principal broker of any affiliate broker,
broker, or firm.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1916
011330
- 1 -